Maine, session 132, LD993.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §4201, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. First responder. "First responder" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section
832-A, subsection 1, paragraph E.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §4203 is enacted to read:
§4203. Mental health crisis and critical incident stress recognition training
The Department of Public Safety shall develop and implement a training program for
first responders and other personnel described in section 4201, subsection 1 that teaches
self-recognition and management of mental health crises and critical incident stress for the
participants of the training and for the participants to recognize and manage mental health
crises and critical incident stress in others. The Department of Public Safety shall
collaborate with other departments and agencies, critical incident stress management peer
support persons, critical incident stress management teams and qualified organizations in
the State dedicated to mental well-being to develop, deliver and periodically update the
training. The training must be designed to present to a participant every 3 years.